South Dakota, session 2026, SB108.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 2-7:
The Legislative Research Council shall establish and maintain on a webpage for
each legislator a record of each vote made by the legislator on each bill and resolution
voted on in that legislator's chamber and in each committee to which the legislator is
appointed during each session and special session of the Legislature convened after July
1, 2026. If the legislator is absent or excused from a vote, the legislator's absence or
excusal must be recorded on the webpage. The voting record for each legislator must be
prominently displayed and easily accessible to the public as a tab on the legislator's profile
page.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.